el: Πρόβλεψη προσκέφαλου: Σταθερά προσκέφαλα (περιλαμβάνονται; Υποδοχή προσκέφαλου (υπάρχουν σημεία στήριξης, δεν περιλαμβάνονται προσκέφαλα); Χωρίς υποστήριξη προσκέφαλου; Δεν ισχύει; Περιλαμβάνονται αφαιρούμενα προσκέφαλα; μη αφαιρούμενα); Άλλο
pt-BR: Provisão para encosto de cabeça: Encostos de cabeça fixos (incluídos; Pronto para encosto de cabeça (pontos de montagem presentes; encostos não incluídos); Sem suporte para encosto de cabeça; Não aplicável; Encostos de cabeça removíveis incluídos; não removíveis); Outro
hr-HR: Osiguravanje naslona za glavu: Fiksni nasloni za glavu (uključeni; Spremno za naslon za glavu (sadrži točke za montažu; nasloni za glavu nisu uključeni); Bez podrške za naslon za glavu; Nije primjenjivo; Uključeni uklonjivi nasloni za glavu; ne mogu se ukloniti); Ostalo
bg-BG: Наличие на облегалка за глава: Фиксирани облегалки за глава (включени; Подготовка за облегалки за глава (има точки за монтаж; не са включени облегалки за глава); Без поддръжка за облегалка за глава; Не е приложимо; Включени сваляеми облегалки за глава; несваляеми); Други
vi: Có bao gồm tựa đầu: Tựa đầu cố định (đi kèm; Hỗ trợ lắp tựa đầu (có điểm gắn; không đi kèm tựa đầu); Không hỗ trợ tựa đầu; Không áp dụng; Đi kèm tựa đầu tháo rời được; không thể tháo rời); Khác
cs: Zajištění opěrky hlavy: Pevné opěrky hlavy (součástí balení; Připraveno pro opěrky hlavy (montážní body k dispozici, opěrky nejsou součástí balení); Bez podpory pro opěrky hlavy; Neuplatňuje se; Odnímatelné opěrky hlavy součástí balení; neodnímatelné); Jiné
pl: Obecność zagłówków: Stałe zagłówki (w zestawie; Przystosowane do zagłówków (obecne punkty mocowania; brak zagłówków w zestawie); Brak wsparcia dla zagłówków; Nie dotyczy; Zdejmowane zagłówki w zestawie; niezdejmowane); Inne
sv: Förekomst av nackstöd: Fasta nackstöd (ingår; Förberedd för nackstöd (fästpunkter finns, nackstöd ingår ej); Inget stöd för nackstöd; Ej tillämpligt; Avtagbara nackstöd ingår; ej avtagbara); Övrigt
de: Kopfstützenausstattung: Feste Kopfstützen (inklusive; Kopfstützen-vorbereitet (Befestigungspunkte vorhanden; Kopfstützen nicht inklusive); Keine Kopfstützenvorrichtung; Nicht zutreffend; Abnehmbare Kopfstützen inklusive; nicht abnehmbar); Sonstige
ru: Комплектация подголовниками: Фиксированные подголовники (в комплекте; С подготовкой под подголовники (крепления есть, подголовников нет); Без поддержки подголовников; Неприменимо; Съемные подголовники в комплекте; несъемные); Другое
zh-TW: 頭枕配置: 固定式頭枕 (隨附; 支援頭枕 (具備安裝點；不含頭枕); 不支援頭枕; 不適用; 包含可拆卸頭枕; 不可拆卸); 其他
sl-SI: Nastavek za naslon za glavo: Fiksni vzglavniki (priloženi; Pripravljeno za vzglavnike (pritrdilne točke so prisotne; vzglavniki niso priloženi); Brez podpore za vzglavnike; Ni uporabno; Odstranljivi vzglavniki so priloženi; neodstranljivi); Drugo
sk-SK: Dodávka opierky hlavy: Pevné opierky hlavy (súčasťou balenia; Pripravené na opierku hlavy (prítomné montážne body; opierky hlavy nie sú súčasťou balenia); Bez podpory opierky hlavy; Neuvádza sa; Vrátane odnímateľných opierok hlavy; neodnímateľné); Iné
lt-LT: Galvos atramos paruošimas: Fiksuoti galvos atlošai (pridedami; Pritaikyta galvos atlošams (yra tvirtinimo taškai; atlošai nepridedami); Nepalaikomi galvos atlošai; Netaikoma; Pridedami nuimami galvos atlošai; neišimami); Kita
da: Mulighed for nakkestøtte: Faste nakkestøtter (inkluderet; Klar til nakkestøtte (monteringspunkter findes, nakkestøtter medfølger ikke); Ingen understøttelse af nakkestøtte; Ikke relevant; Aftagelige nakkestøtter inkluderet; ikke-aftagelige); Andet
ja: ヘッドレストの取り付け: 固定ヘッドレスト (付属; ヘッドレスト対応 (取り付けポイントあり、ヘッドレストは付属しません); ヘッドレストサポートなし; 該当なし; 取り外し可能なヘッドレスト付属; 取り外し不可); その他
tr: Başlık uyumluluğu: Sabit koltuk başlıkları (dahil; Koltuk başlığına hazır (montaj noktaları mevcut, koltuk başlıkları dahil değil); Koltuk başlığı desteği yok; Geçerli değil; Çıkarılabilir koltuk başlıkları dahil; çıkarılamaz); Diğer
ro-RO: Tetieră: Tetiere fixe (incluse; Pregătit pentru tetiere (puncte de montare prezente; tetierele nu sunt incluse); Fără suport pentru tetieră; Nu se aplică; Tetiere detașabile incluse; nedetașabile); Altele
pt-PT: Apoio de cabeça: Encostos de cabeça fixos (incluídos; Preparado para encostos de cabeça (pontos de montagem presentes; encostos de cabeça não incluídos); Sem suporte para encosto de cabeça; Não aplicável; Encostos de cabeça amovíveis incluídos; não amovível); Outro
zh-CN: 头枕预留接口: 固定式头枕（含; 支持安装头枕（预留安装点；不含头枕）; 不支持安装头枕; 不适用; 包含可拆卸头枕; 不可拆卸）; 其他
nl: Hoofdsteun voorziening: Vaste hoofdsteunen (inbegrepen; Geschikt voor hoofdsteun (bevestigingspunten aanwezig; hoofdsteunen niet inbegrepen); Geen hoofdsteunondersteuning; Niet van toepassing; Inclusief verwijderbare hoofdsteunen; niet verwijderbaar); Overig
th: การจัดเตรียมพนักพิงศีรษะ: พนักพิงศีรษะแบบยึดติด (มีให้; รองรับพนักพิงศีรษะ (มีจุดยึด แต่ไม่มีพนักพิงศีรษะให้); ไม่รองรับพนักพิงศีรษะ; ไม่เกี่ยวข้อง; มีพนักพิงศีรษะแบบถอดออกได้ให้ในชุด; ถอดออกไม่ได้); อื่นๆ
hu: Fejtámla biztosítása: Fix fejtámlák (mellékelve; Fejtámla-előkészítés (rögzítési pontok megvannak; fejtámla nem tartozék); Nincs fejtámla-kialakítás; Nem alkalmazható; Levehető fejtámlák mellékelve; nem eltávolítható); Egyéb
es: Provisión de reposacabezas: Reposacabezas fijos (incluidos; Preparado para reposacabezas (puntos de montaje presentes; reposacabezas no incluidos); Sin soporte para reposacabezas; No aplica; Reposacabezas extraíbles incluidos; no extraíbles); Otro
fi: Pääntuen kiinnitys: Kiinteät niskatuet (sisältyvät; Niskatukivalmius (kiinnityskohdat; niskatuet eivät sisälly); Ei niskatukea; Ei sovelleta; Irrotettavat niskatuet sisältyvät; ei irrotettavat); Muu
ko: 머리 받침대 제공: 고정형 헤드레스트(포함; 헤드레스트 준비 완료(마운팅 포인트 있음, 헤드레스트 미포함); 헤드레스트 미지원; 해당 없음; 분리형 헤드레스트 포함; 분리 불가); 기타
en: Headrest provision: Fixed headrests (included; Headrest-ready (mounting points present; headrests not included); No headrest support; Not applicable; Removable headrests included; non-removable); Other
fr: Prédisposition pour appuie-tête: Appuie-têtes fixes (inclus; Prêt pour appuie-tête (points de montage présents ; appuie-têtes non inclus); Sans support d’appui-tête; Sans objet; Appuie-têtes amovibles inclus; non amovibles); Autre
nb: Nakkestøttetildeling: Faste nakkestøtter (inkludert; Klargjort for nakkestøtte (festepunkter til stede, nakkestøtter ikke inkludert); Ingen støtte for nakkestøtte; Ikke aktuelt; Avtakbare nakkestøtter inkludert; ikke-avtakbare); Annet
it: predisposizione per poggiatesta: Poggiatesta fissi (inclusi; Predisposizione poggiatesta (punti di montaggio presenti; poggiatesta non inclusi); Nessun supporto per poggiatesta; Non applicabile; Poggiatesta rimovibili inclusi; non rimovibili); Altro